exercise3/fin_cons_grad_lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +N       ! Noun tag
        +Sg      ! Singular tag
        +Ptv     ! Partitive
        +Gen     ! Genitive

LEXICON Root
        NounStems ;

LEXICON NounStems

sika    N_BackVowel ;
mörkö   N_FrontVowel ;
papu    N_BackVowel ;
kylpy   N_FrontVowel ;
sota    N_BackVowel ;
lähtö   N_FrontVowel ;

kukka   N_BackVowel ;
kyykky  n_FrontVowel ;
loppu   N_BackVowel ;
kymppi  N_FrontVowel ;
matto   N_BackVowel ;
nörtti  N_FrontVowel ;

tiuku   N_BackVowel ;
ruoko   N_BackVowel ;
vaaka   N_BackVowel ;

puku    N_BackVowel ;
kyky    N_FrontVowel ;

kurki:kurke     N_BackVowel ;
kärki:kärke     N_FrontVowel ;

vanki   N_BackVowel ;
sänky   N_FrontVowel ;
kumpu   N_BackVowel ;
lämpö   N_FrontVowel ;
ranta   N_BackVowel ;
häntä   N_FrontVowel ;

ilta    N_BackVowel ;
kulta   N_BackVowel ;
parta   N_BackVowel ;
pyörtö  N_FrontVowel ;

aika    N_BackVowel ;
poika   N_BackVowel ;
ruoka   N_BackVowel ;

LEXICON N_BackVowel
+N+Sg:^         Case_BackVowel ;

LEXICON N_FrontVowel
+N+Sg:^         Case_FrontVowel ;

LEXICON Case_BackVowel
+Ptv:a          # ;
+Gen:n          # ;
+Ess:na         # ;
+Tra:ksi        # ;

LEXICON Case_FrontVowel
+Ptv:ä          # ;
+Gen:n          # ;
+Ess:nä         # ;
+Tra:ksi        # ;

END
